test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-86ristjmae_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `ristʼmä: # Verb (86) `ristʼmä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     ristʼmä+V+Inf/mA: ristʼmä
     ristʼmä+V+Inf: ristiq
     ristʼmä+V+Act+PrfPrc: ristʼnüq 
     ristʼmä+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [ristit, ristitü]

     ristʼmä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: risti
     ristʼmä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [ristit, ristideq]
     ristʼmä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ristʼ
     ristʼmä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ristimiq
     ristʼmä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ristitiq
     ristʼmä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ristʼväq
     ristʼmä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [riste, ristʼse]
     ristʼmä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [ristet, risteq, ristedeq, ristʼset, ristʼsedeq, ristʼseq]
     ristʼmä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [riste, ristʼse]
     ristʼmä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [ristemiq, ristʼsemiq]
     ristʼmä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [ristetiq, ristʼsetiq]
     ristʼmä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [risteq, risteväq, ristʼseq, ristʼseväq]
     ristʼmä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: risti

     ristʼmä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ristidä
     ristʼmä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ristitäs

     ristʼmä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: ristʼvä

     ristʼmä+V+Jus: ristʼkuq
